Indiana, session 2026, SB131.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 12-7-2-122.4, AS ADDED BY P.L.168-2018,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 122.4. (a) "Legal assistance developer", for
purposes of IC 12-10-13, has the meaning set forth in IC 12-10-13-3.2.
(b) "Legal assistance developer", for purposes of IC 12-21-10,
has the meaning set forth in IC 12-21-10-1.
SECTION 2. IC 12-7-2-122.5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 122.5. (a) "Legal
representative", for purposes of IC 12-10-13, has the meaning set forth
in IC 12-10-13-3.3.
(b) "Legal representative", for purposes of IC 12-21-10, has the
meaning set forth in IC 12-21-10-2.
SECTION 3. IC 12-7-2-134, AS AMENDED BY P.L.35-2016,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 134. "Office" means the following:
(1) Except as provided in subdivisions (2) through (5), (6), the
office of the secretary established by IC 12-8-1.5-1.
2026 IN 131—LS 6396/DI 147


(2) For purposes of IC 12-10-13, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-10-13-4.
(3) For purposes of IC 12-15-13, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-15-13-0.4.
(4) For purposes of IC 12-17.2-7.2, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-17.2-7.2-3.
(5) For purposes of IC 12-17.6, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-17.6-1-4.
(6) For purposes of IC 12-21-10, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-21-10-3.
SECTION 4. IC 12-7-2-134, AS AMENDED BY P.L.134-2019,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 134. "Office" means the following:
(1) Except as provided in subdivisions (2) through (7) and (9), the
office of Medicaid policy and planning established by
IC 12-8-6.5-1.
(2) For purposes of IC 12-10-13, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-10-13-4.
(3) For purposes of IC 12-15-5-14, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-15-5-14(b).
(4) For purposes of IC 12-15-5-15, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-15-5-15(b).
(5) For purposes of IC 12-15-5-16, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-15-5-16(b).
(6) For purposes of IC 12-15-13, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-15-13-0.4.
(7) For purposes of IC 12-15-13.5, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-15-13.5-1.
(8) For purposes of IC 12-17.6, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-17.6-1-4.
(9) For purposes of IC 12-21-10, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-21-10-3.
SECTION 5. IC 12-7-2-135.3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.174-2025,
SECTION 11, AND P.L.243-2025, SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 135.3. (a)
"Ombudsman", for purposes of IC 12-10-13, has the meaning set forth
in IC 12-10-13-4.5.
(b) "Ombudsman", for purposes of IC 12-11-13, has the meaning set
forth in IC 12-11-13-2.
(c) "Ombudsman", for purposes of IC 12-21-10, has the
meaning set forth in IC 12-21-10-4.
SECTION 6. IC 12-7-2-151, AS AMENDED BY P.L.56-2023,
2026 IN 131—LS 6396/DI 147


SECTION 83, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 151. (a) "Psychiatric hospital", for purposes of
section 82 of this chapter, means any of the following:
(1) A state institution.
(2) A general hospital:
(A) licensed by the Indiana department of health; and
(B) that maintains and operates facilities for the observation,
care, treatment, and detention of individuals who have a
mental illness.
(3) A private psychiatric hospital licensed by the division of
mental health and addiction.
(b) "Psychiatric hospital", for purposes of IC 12-21-10, has the
meaning set forth in IC 12-21-10-5.
SECTION 7. IC 12-7-2-185 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 185. (a) "State
ombudsman", for purposes of IC 12-10-13, has the meaning set forth
in IC 12-10-13-6.
(b) "State ombudsman", for purposes of IC 12-21-10, has the
meaning set forth in IC 12-21-10-6.
SECTION 8. IC 12-21-10 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 10. Psychiatric Care Ombudsman Program
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "legal assistance developer" has
the meaning set forth in 42 U.S.C. 3058j.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "legal representative" means:
(1) a guardian;
(2) a health care representative acting under IC 16-36-1 or
IC 16-36-7;
(3) an attorney-in-fact for health care appointed under
IC 30-5-5-16;
(4) an attorney-in-fact appointed under IC 30-5-5 who does
not hold health care powers; or
(5) the personal representative of the estate;
of a patient of a psychiatric hospital.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "office" refers to the psychiatric
care ombudsman office established under this chapter. The term
includes individuals approved to act in the capacity of ombudsmen
by the psychiatric care ombudsman office.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "ombudsman" means an
individual or entity designated by the state ombudsman to
investigate and resolve local complaints and concerns regarding
2026 IN 131—LS 6396/DI 147


the health, safety, welfare, or rights of patients of psychiatric
hospitals.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "psychiatric hospital" means a
private institution licensed under IC 12-25 and public institutions
under the administrative control of the director of a division as
designated by IC 12-24-1-3.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "state ombudsman" refers to the
individual appointed by the secretary or the secretary's designee
to administer the psychiatric care ombudsman program and office
under 42 U.S.C. 10801 et seq. and this chapter.
Sec. 7. The division shall establish the psychiatric care
ombudsman office in compliance with 42 U.S.C. 10801 et seq.
Sec. 8. Subject to sections 10 through 12 of this chapter, the
secretary or the secretary's designee shall appoint the state
ombudsman to direct the office on a full-time basis.
Sec. 9. The secretary or the secretary's designee shall appoint an
acting state ombudsman within thirty (30) days of a vacancy in the
position of state ombudsman. The acting state ombudsman has the
powers and duties of the state ombudsman.
Sec. 10. The state ombudsman must have knowledge of acute
psychiatric inpatient care.
Sec. 11. The state ombudsman may not have been employed by
a psychiatric hospital within one (1) year preceding the proposed
appointment by the secretary or the secretary's designee.
Sec. 12. The state ombudsman or a member of the state
ombudsman's immediate family may not have had a pecuniary
interest in a psychiatric hospital within three (3) years preceding
the director's proposed appointment.
Sec. 13. The state ombudsman may employ technical experts
and other employees to carry out the purposes of the office.
Sec. 14. The office shall receive, investigate, and attempt to
resolve complaints and concerns that:
(1) are made by or on behalf of a patient or client of a
psychiatric hospital; and
(2) involve the health, safety, welfare, or rights of a patient of
a psychiatric hospital.
Sec. 15. At the conclusion of an investigation of a complaint, the
office may, with the informed consent of the patient or patient's
legal representative, disclose records, findings, and documentation
of an investigated case maintained by the office to parties
associated with a patient involved in the investigation.
Sec. 16. In accordance with this chapter, an ombudsman must
2026 IN 131—LS 6396/DI 147


be provided access to the following:
(1) Psychiatric hospitals and the patients of psychiatric
hospitals.
(2) As provided in section 17 of this chapter, a patient's
medical, financial, and social records.
(3) If the patient is incapable of giving consent, as determined
by the attending physician or as otherwise determined under
state law, the name, address, and telephone number of the
patient's legal representative.
Sec. 17. (a) An ombudsman must be provided access to a
patient's medical, financial, and social records. Except as provided
in subsections (c) and (d), the ombudsman must obtain consent
under subsection (b) before having access to the records.
(b) Consent to have access to a patient's medical, financial, and
social records shall be given in one (1) of the following forms:
(1) In writing by the patient.
(2) Orally by the patient.
(3) Through the use of auxiliary aids and services.
(4) In writing by the legal representative of the patient if:
(A) the patient is incapable of giving consent, as
determined by the attending physician or as otherwise
determined under state law; and
(B) the legal representative has the authority to give
consent.
(5) Visually by the patient.
(c) If consent to have access to a patient's medical, financial, and
social records cannot be obtained under subsection (b), an
ombudsman may inspect the records of a patient if the patient is
incapable of giving consent, as determined by the attending
physician or as otherwise determined under state law, and:
(1) has no legal representative;
(2) has a legal representative but the legal representative
cannot be contacted within three (3) days; or
(3) has a legal representative but the legal representative does
not have the authority to give consent to have access to the
records.
(d) If an ombudsman has:
(1) been denied access to a patient's medical, financial, and
social records by the patient's legal representative;
(2) reasonable cause to believe that the patient's legal
representative is not acting in the best interests of the patient;
and
2026 IN 131—LS 6396/DI 147


(3) received written approval from the state ombudsman;
the ombudsman may inspect the records of the patient.
Sec. 18. An ombudsman shall be given appropriate access to the
records of a psychiatric hospital, including the following:
(1) Administrative policies.
(2) Licensing and certification records.
(3) Survey results.
Sec. 19. A state or local government agency or entity that has
records that are relevant to a complaint or an investigation
conducted by an ombudsman shall provide the ombudsman with
access to the records.
Sec. 20. A psychiatric hospital or an employee of a psychiatric
hospital is immune from:
(1) civil or criminal liability; and
(2) actions taken under a professional disciplinary procedure;
for the release or disclosure of records to an ombudsman under
this chapter.
Sec. 21. The office shall do the following:
(1) Promote effective coordination between the office and the
following:
(A) Programs that provide legal services for individuals
who need psychiatric care.
(B) The attorney general's Medicaid fraud control unit.
(C) The Indiana department of health.
(D) Indiana protection and advocacy services.
(E) The state's legal assistance developer.
(2) Establish a statewide toll free telephone line to receive
reports of patients' complaints concerning psychiatric
hospitals.
(3) Ensure that the identity of a complainant or patient will
not be disclosed without:
(A) the complainant's or patient's written consent; or
(B) a court order.
Sec. 22. The secretary shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2
necessary to carry out this chapter.
Sec. 23. A representative of the office is not civilly liable for the
good faith performance of official duties.
Sec. 24. (a) The office shall prepare a report each year on the
operations of the office.
(b) A copy of the report shall be provided to the following:
(1) The governor.
(2) The general assembly. The report must be in an electronic
2026 IN 131—LS 6396/DI 147


format under IC 5-14-6.
(3) The division.
(4) The secretary.
(5) The Indiana department of health.
Sec. 25. A person who:
(1) intentionally prevents the work of the office;
(2) knowingly offers compensation to the office in an effort to
affect the outcome of an investigation or a potential
investigation; or
(3) retaliates against a patient, an employee, or another
person who files a complaint or provides information to the
office;
commits a Class B misdemeanor.
Sec. 26. The office shall make available independent legal
counsel for the state ombudsman for the following:
(1) Representation of the state ombudsman against a lawsuit
or other legal action that is brought or threatened to be
brought against the state ombudsman in connection with the
state ombudsman's performance of the state ombudsman's
official duties of the psychiatric care ombudsman program.
(2) Advice and counsel for the state ombudsman in protecting
a patient's rights.
(3) The drafting of rules, policies, and procedures for the
operation of the psychiatric care ombudsman program.
(4) Advice concerning complaint resolution of complex cases.
Sec. 27. The office shall ensure that grievances and complaints
are addressed concerning the following:
(1) Action taken or failure to take action on behalf of a
patient.
(2) Designation or revocation of designation of local:
(A) host agencies; or
(B) representatives of the psychiatric care ombudsman
program and office.
SECTION 9. IC 16-21-14-1, AS ADDED BY P.L.133-2019,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) This section and section 2 of this chapter do
not apply to the following:
(1) A hospital that primarily provides inpatient and outpatient
services to a pediatric population.
(2) A psychiatric hospital (as defined in IC 12-7-2-151).
IC 12-7-2-151(a)).
(b) Each hospital shall adopt, implement, and periodically update
2026 IN 131—LS 6396/DI 147


evidence based sepsis guidelines for the early recognition and
treatment of patients with sepsis, severe sepsis, or septic shock that are
based on generally accepted guidelines. The sepsis guidelines must
include components specific to the identification, care, and treatment
of adults.
SECTION 10. IC 16-36-1.5-6 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. In order to comply
with this chapter, a mental health provider needs to obtain only one (1)
consent for mental health services for a patient while admitted in or
treated as an outpatient at the main facility or a clinic of any of the
following:
(1) A psychiatric hospital (as defined in IC 12-7-2-151).
IC 12-7-2-151(a)).
(2) A hospital (as defined in IC 16-18-2-179(b)).
(3) A community mental health center (as defined in
IC 12-7-2-38).
SECTION 11. IC 27-8-5-15.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.56-2023,
SECTION 245, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15.5. (a) As used in this section:
"Alcohol abuse" has the meaning set forth in IC 12-7-2-10.
"Community mental health center" has the meaning set forth in
IC 12-7-2-38 and IC 12-7-2-39.
"Division of mental health and addiction" refers to the division
created under IC 12-21-1-1.
"Drug abuse" has the meaning set forth in IC 12-7-2-72.
"Indiana department of health" refers to the department established
by IC 16-19-1-1.
"Inpatient services" means services that require the beneficiary of
the services to remain overnight in the facility in which the services are
offered.
"Mental illness" has the meaning set forth in IC 12-7-2-130(1).
"Psychiatric hospital" has the meaning set forth in IC 12-7-2-151.
IC 12-7-2-151(a).
"Substance abuse" means drug abuse or alcohol abuse.
(b) An insurance policy that provides coverage for inpatient services
for the treatment of:
(1) mental illness;
(2) substance abuse; or
(3) both mental illness and substance abuse;
may not exclude coverage for inpatient services for the treatment of
mental illness or substance abuse that are provided by a community
mental health center or by any psychiatric hospital licensed by the
2026 IN 131—LS 6396/DI 147


Indiana department of health or the division of mental health and
addiction to offer those services.
SECTION 12. IC 34-30-2.1-147.4 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 147.4. IC 12-21-10-20
(Concerning a psychiatric hospital or its employees for release or
disclosure of records to an ombudsman).
SECTION 13. IC 34-30-2.1-147.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 147.5. IC 12-21-10-23
(Concerning representatives of the psychiatric care ombudsman's
office).
SECTION 14. IC 35-52-12-11.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11.2. IC 12-21-10-25 defines a
crime concerning the psychiatric care ombudsman program.
2026 IN 131—LS 6396/DI 147